Yamls/N-kaga_gt-norm.yaml
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кагаэзланьӧдззат, кагаэзланьӧдззит, кагаэтланьӧдз, кагаэзытланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [кагаэтланьви, кагаэзытланьви]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [кагаэс, кагаэзыс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [кагаэслӧн, кагаэзыслӧн]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [кагаэслісь, кагаэзыслісь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [кагаэслӧ, кагаэзыслӧ]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [кагаэсӧ, кагаэзсӧ]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: кагаэзнас
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [кагаэскӧт, кагаэзыскӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [кагаэстӧг, кагаэзыстӧг, кагаэзтӧгьяс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [кагаэсла, кагаэзысла]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [кагаэсся, кагаэзысся]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: кагаэзас
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [кагаэзсис, кагаэсис]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: кагаэзас
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [кагаэслань, кагаэзыслань, кагаэзланяс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [кагаэссянь, кагаэзыссянь, кагаэзсяняс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [кагаэзӧттяс, кагаэзӧттис]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [кагаэзӧдззас, кагаэзӧдззис]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: кагаэсви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: кагаэзланяс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: кагаэзланьсис
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: кагаэзланяс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кагаэзланьсяняс, кагаэсланьсянь, кагаэзысланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кагаэзланьӧттяс, кагаэзланьӧттис, кагаэсланьӧт, кагаэзысланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кагаэзланьӧдззаc, кагаэзланьӧдззиc, кагаэсланьӧдз, кагаэзысланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: кагаэсланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: кагаэзным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: кагаэзнымлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: кагаэзнымлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: кагаэзнымлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: кагаэзнымӧс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: кагаэзнаным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl1: кагаэзнымкӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [кагаэзнымтӧг, кагаэзтӧгьяным]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: кагаэзнымла
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: кагаэзнымся
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: кагаэзаным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [кагаэзсиным, кагаэсиным]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: кагаэзаным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [кагаэзнымлань, кагаэзланяным]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [кагаэзнымсянь, кагаэзсяняным]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [кагаэзӧттяным, кагаэзӧттиным]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [кагаэзӧдззаным, кагаэзӧдззиным]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: кагаэзнымви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: кагаэзланяным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: кагаэзланьсиным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: кагаэзланяным
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кагаэзланьсяняным, кагаэзнымланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кагаэзланьӧттяным, кагаэзланьӧттиным, кагаэзнымланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кагаэзланьӧдззаным, кагаэзланьӧдззиным, кагаэзнымланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: кагаэзнымланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: кагаэзныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: кагаэзнытлӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: кагаэзнытлісь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: кагаэзнытлӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: кагаэзнытӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: кагаэзнаныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl2: кагаэзныткӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [кагаэзныттӧг, кагаэзтӧгьяныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: кагаэзнытла
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: кагаэзнытся
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: кагаэзаныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [кагаэзсиныт, кагаэсиныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: кагаэзаныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [кагаэзнытлань, кагаэзланяныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [кагаэзнытсянь, кагаэзсяняныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [кагаэзӧттяныт, кагаэзӧттиныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [кагаэзӧдззаныт, кагаэзӧдззиныт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: кагаэзнытви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: кагаэзланяныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: кагаэзланьсиныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: кагаэзланяныт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кагаэзланьсяняныт, кагаэзнытланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кагаэзланьӧттяныт, кагаэзланьӧттиныт, кагаэзнытланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кагаэзланьӧдззаныт, кагаэзланьӧдззиныт, кагаэзнытланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: кагаэзнытланьви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: кагаэзныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: кагаэзныслӧн
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: кагаэзныслісь
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: кагаэзныслӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: кагаэзнысӧ
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: кагаэзнаныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl3: кагаэзныскӧт
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [кагаэзныстӧг, кагаэзтӧгьяныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: кагаэзнысла
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: кагаэзнысся
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: кагаэзаныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [кагаэзсиныс, кагаэсиныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: кагаэзаныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [кагаэзныслань, кагаэзланяныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [кагаэзныссянь, кагаэзсяняныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [кагаэзӧттяныс, кагаэзӧттиныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [кагаэзӧдззаныс, кагаэзӧдззиныс]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: кагаэзнысви
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: кагаэзланяныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: кагаэзланьсиныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: кагаэзланяныс
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кагаэзланьсяняныс, кагаэзнысланьсянь]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кагаэзланьӧттяныс, кагаэзланьӧттиныс, кагаэзнысланьӧт]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кагаэзланьӧдззаныс, кагаэзланьӧдззиныс, кагаэзнысланьӧдз]
     кага+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: кагаэзнысланьви
